California statutes. Penal Code
(d) For a second or subsequent violation as provided in subdivision (c), a court shall order a person to pay an additional fine of up to two hundred dollars ($200) and to attend a traffic school offering a rail safety presentation, Internet rail safety test, or rail safety film prepared by a county transportation commission or authority.

(e) All fines collected according to this section shall be distributed pursuant to Sections 1463 and 1463.12, as applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 716, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

369d.

Any person who enters upon or crosses any railroad, at any private passway, which is inclosed by bars or gates, and neglects to leave the same securely closed after him, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1905, Ch. 573.)
-------------------------------------------

369g.

(a) Any person who rides, drives, or propels any vehicle upon and along the track of any railroad through or over its private right-of-way, without the authorization of its superintendent or other officer in charge thereof, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) Any person who rides, drives, or propels any vehicle upon and along the track of any railline owned or operated by a county transportation commission or transportation authority without the authorization of the commission or authority is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 722, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

369h.

Any person, partnership, firm or corporation installing, setting up, maintaining or operating upon public or private property, any sign or light in line of vision along any main line track of any railroad in this State of such type or in such form or manner that it may be mistaken for any fixed or standard railroad signal when viewed from an approaching locomotive cab, railway car, or train, by the operators or employees upon such locomotive cab, railway car or train, so as to hinder the safe and efficient operation of such locomotive, railway car or train, and endanger the safety of persons or property upon such locomotive, railway car, or train, shall be guilty of maintaining a public nuisance. No sign, signal, flare or light placed within the right of way of any street or highway by public authorities in charge thereof, considered necessary by them to direct or warn highway traffic, shall be deemed to violate this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 153.)
-------------------------------------------

369i.

(a) (1) Any person who enters or remains upon the property of any railroad without the permission of the owner of the land, the owner’s agent, or the person in lawful possession and whose entry, presence, or conduct upon the property interferes with, interrupts, or hinders, or which, if allowed to continue, would interfere with, interrupt, or hinder the safe and efficient operation of any locomotive, railway car, or train is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2) As used in this subdivision, “property of any railroad” means any land owned, leased, or possessed by a railroad upon which is placed a railroad track and the land immediately adjacent thereto, to the distance of 20 feet on either side of the track, that is owned, leased, or possessed by a
 railroad.

(b) (1) Any person who enters or remains upon any transit-related property without permission or whose entry, presence, or conduct upon the property interferes with, interrupts, or hinders the safe and efficient operation of the transit-related facility is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2) As used in this subdivision, “transit-related property” means any land, facilities, or vehicles owned, leased, or possessed by a county transportation commission, transportation authority, or transit district, as defined in Section 99170 of the Public Utilities Code, that are used to provide public transportation by rail or passenger bus or are directly related to that use, or any property, facilities, or vehicles upon which the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District owes policing responsibilities to a local government pursuant to an operations and maintenance
 agreement or similar interagency agreement.

(c) This section does not prohibit picketing in the immediately adjacent area of the property of any railroad or transit-related property or any lawful activity by which the public is informed of the existence of an alleged labor dispute.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 534, Sec. 1.   (AB 1337)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

[370.]

Section Three Hundred and Seventy. Anything which is injurious to health, or is indecent, or offensive to the senses, or an obstruction to the free use of property, so as to interfere with the comfortable enjoyment of life or property by an entire community or neighborhood, or by any considerable number of persons, or unlawfully obstructs the free passage or use, in the customary manner, of any navigable lake, or river, bay, stream, canal, or basin, or any public park, square, street, or highway, is a public nuisance.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 614.)
-------------------------------------------

371.

An act which affects an entire community or neighborhood, or any considerable number of persons, as specified in the last section, is not less a nuisance because the extent of the annoyance or damage inflicted upon individuals is unequal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1360, Sec. 109.)
-------------------------------------------

372.

Every person who maintains or commits any public nuisance, the punishment for which is not otherwise prescribed, or who willfully omits to perform any legal duty relating to the removal of a public nuisance, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

372.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 372, if a defendant is sentenced for a violation of Section 370 based on a disposition negotiated between the defendant and the prosecution, or pursuant to an indicated sentence of the court, a term of which includes the dismissal of one or more infraction charges that allege unlawfully cultivating, manufacturing, transporting, giving away, or selling a drug, or offering to transport, give away, or sell a drug, unlawful use of a drug, or unlawful possession or use of a drug or drug paraphernalia, public nuisance is an infraction punishable by a fine not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(b) Notwithstanding Section 372, if a defendant is sentenced for a violation of Section 370 based on a disposition
 negotiated between the defendant and the prosecution, a term of which includes the dismissal of one or more misdemeanor charges that allege unlawfully cultivating, manufacturing, transporting, giving away, or selling a drug, or offering to transport, give away, or sell a drug, unlawful use of a drug, or unlawful possession or use of a drug or drug paraphernalia, public nuisance is punishable by a fine of not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment, or as an infraction punishable by a fine not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(c) Notwithstanding Section 372, if a defendant is sentenced for a violation of Section 370 based on a disposition negotiated between the defendant and the prosecution, a term of which includes the dismissal of one or more felony charges that allege cultivating, manufacturing, transporting, giving away, or selling
 a drug, or offering to transport, give away, or to sell a drug, or unlawful possession of a drug, public nuisance is punishable pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for a period of 16 months, or two or three years, or by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year.

(d) For purposes of this section, “drug” is defined as under Section 11014 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 487, Sec. 1.   (AB 2195)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

372.7.

Local law enforcement or a local jurisdiction shall not bring or threaten a nuisance action pursuant to Section 372 or 373a against a business, or impose fines pursuant to Section 372 or 373a upon a business, solely for the act of reporting retail crime, unless the report is knowingly false.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 168, Sec. 1.   (AB 2943)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

373a.

Each person who maintains, permits, or allows a public nuisance to exist upon his or her property or premises, and each person occupying or leasing the property or premises of another who maintains, permits, or allows a public nuisance to exist on the property, after reasonable notice in writing from a health officer, district attorney, city attorney, or city prosecutor to remove, discontinue, or abate the public nuisance has been served upon the person, is guilty of a misdemeanor. The existence of the public nuisance for each and every day after the service of the notice is a separate and distinct offense, and it is the duty of the district attorney, or the city attorney or city prosecutor of any city the
 charter of which imposes the duty upon the city attorney or city prosecutor to prosecute state misdemeanors, to continuously prosecute all persons guilty of violating this section until the nuisance is abated and
 removed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 299, Sec. 1.   (AB 1418)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

374.

(a) Littering means the willful or negligent throwing, dropping, placing, depositing, or sweeping, or causing any such acts, of any waste matter on land or water in other than appropriate storage containers or areas designated for such purposes.

(b) Waste matter means discarded, used, or leftover substance including, but not limited to, a lighted or nonlighted cigarette, cigar, match, or any flaming or glowing material, or any garbage, trash, refuse, paper, container, packaging or construction material, carcass of a dead animal, any nauseous or offensive matter of any kind, or any object likely to injure any person or create a traffic hazard.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1548.)
-------------------------------------------

374.2.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to maliciously discharge, dump, release, place, drop, pour, or otherwise deposit, or to maliciously cause to be discharged, dumped, released, placed, dropped, poured, or otherwise deposited, any substance capable of causing substantial damage or harm to the operation of a public sewer sanitary facility, or to deposit in commercial quantities any other substance, into a manhole, cleanout, or other sanitary sewer facility, not intended for use as a point of deposit for sewage, which is connected to a public sanitary sewer system, without possessing a written authorization therefor granted by the public entity which is charged with the administration of the use of the affected public sanitary sewer system or the
 affected portion of the public sanitary sewer system.

As used in this section, “maliciously” means an intent to do a wrongful act.

(b) For the purposes of this section “person” means an individual, trust, firm, partnership, joint stock company, limited liability company, or corporation, and “deposited in commercial quantities” refers to any substance deposited or otherwise discharged in any amount greater than for normal domestic sewer use.

(c) Lack of specific knowledge that the facility into which the prohibited discharge or release occurred is connected to a public sanitary sewer system shall not constitute a defense to a violation charged under this section.

(d) Any person who violates this section shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than
 one year, or by a fine of up to twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or by both a fine and imprisonment. If the conviction is for a second or subsequent violation, the person shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for 16, 20, or 24 months, and by a fine of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 337.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

374.3.

(a) It is unlawful to dump or cause to be dumped waste matter in or upon a public or private highway or road, including any portion of the right-of-way thereof, or in or upon private property into or upon which the public is admitted by easement or license, or upon private property without the consent of the owner, or in or upon a public park or other public property other than property designated or set aside for that purpose by the governing board or body having charge of that property.

(b) It is unlawful to place, deposit, or dump, or cause to be placed, deposited, or dumped, rocks, concrete, asphalt, or dirt in or upon a private highway or road,
 including any portion of the right-of-way of the private highway or road, or private property, without the consent of the owner or a contractor under contract with the owner for the materials, or in or upon a public park or other public property, without the consent of the state or local agency having jurisdiction over the highway, road, or property.

(c) A person violating this section is guilty of an infraction. Each day that waste placed, deposited, or dumped in violation of subdivision (a) or (b) remains is a separate violation.

(d) This section does not restrict a private owner in the use of their own private property, unless the placing, depositing, or dumping of the waste matter on the property creates a public health and safety hazard, a public nuisance, or a fire hazard, as determined
 by a local health department, local fire department or district providing fire protection services, or the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, in which case this section applies.

(e) A person convicted of a violation of this section shall be punished by a mandatory fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) upon a first conviction, by a mandatory fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) upon a second conviction, and by a mandatory fine of not less than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) nor more than three thousand dollars ($3,000) upon a third or subsequent conviction. If the court finds that the waste matter placed, deposited, or dumped was used tires, the fine prescribed in this subdivision shall be
 doubled.

(f) The court may require, in addition to any fine imposed upon a conviction, that a person convicted under this section remove, or pay the cost of removing, any waste matter which the convicted person dumped or caused to be dumped upon public or private property.

(g) The
 court may, in addition to the fine imposed upon a conviction, require that a person convicted of a violation of this section pick up waste matter at a time and place within the jurisdiction of the court for not less than 12 hours.

(h) (1) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2), a person who places, deposits, or dumps, or causes to be placed, deposited, or dumped, waste matter in violation of this section in commercial quantities shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than six months and by a fine. The fine is mandatory and shall amount to not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than
 three thousand dollars ($3,000) upon a first conviction, not less than three thousand dollars ($3,000) nor more than six thousand dollars ($6,000) upon a second conviction, and not less than six thousand dollars ($6,000) nor more than
 ten thousand dollars ($10,000) upon a third or subsequent conviction.

(2) If a person convicted under paragraph (1) is the owner or operator of the business involved in the illegal dumping, and that business employs more than 10 full-time employees, the fine shall amount to not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) upon a first conviction, not less than three thousand dollars ($3,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) upon a second conviction, and not less than six thousand dollars ($6,000) nor more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) upon a third or
 subsequent conviction.

(3) The court shall require, in addition to the fine imposed upon a conviction,
 that a person convicted under this subdivision remove, or pay the cost of removing, any waste matter which the convicted person dumped or caused to be dumped upon public or private property.

(4) (A) If a person convicted under this subdivision holds a license or permit to conduct business that is substantially related to the illegal dumping for which the person was convicted, the court shall notify the applicable licensing or permitting entity subject to the jurisdiction of the Department of Consumer Affairs as set forth in Section 101 of the Business and Professions Code, if any, of the conviction.

(B) The licensing or permitting entity shall record and post the offense on the public profile of the license or permitholder on the internet website of the entity.

(5) “Commercial quantities” means an amount of waste matter generated in
 the course of a trade, business, profession, or occupation, or an amount equal to or in excess of one cubic yard. This subdivision does not apply to the dumping of household waste at a person’s own residence.

(i) For purposes of this section, “person” means an individual, trust, firm, partnership, joint stock company, joint venture, or corporation.

(j) When setting fines pursuant to this section, the court shall consider the defendant’s ability to pay, including consideration of, without limitation, all of the following:

(1) The defendant’s present financial position.

(2) The defendant’s reasonably discernible future financial position, provided that the court shall not consider a period of more than one year from the date of the hearing for purposes of determining the reasonably discernible future financial position of the defendant.

(3) The likelihood that the defendant will be able to
 obtain employment within one year from the date of the hearing.

(4) Any other factor that may bear upon the defendant’s financial capability to pay the fine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 784, Sec. 1.   (AB 2374)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

374.4.

(a) It is unlawful to litter or cause to be littered in or upon public or private property. A person, firm, or corporation violating this section is guilty of an infraction.

(b) This section does not restrict a private owner in the use of his or her own property, unless the littering of waste matter on the property creates a public health and safety hazard, a public nuisance, or a fire hazard, as determined by a local health department, local fire department or district providing fire protection services, or the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, in which case this section applies.

(c) As used in this section, “litter” means the discarding, dropping, or scattering of small quantities of waste matter ordinarily carried on or about the person, including, but not limited to, beverage containers and closures, packaging, wrappers, wastepaper, newspapers, and magazines, in a place other than a place or container for the proper disposal thereof, and including waste matter that escapes or is allowed to escape from a container, receptacle, or package.

(d) A person, firm, or corporation convicted of a violation of this section shall be punished by a mandatory fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) upon a first conviction, by a mandatory fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) upon a second conviction, and by a mandatory fine of not less than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) nor more than three thousand dollars ($3,000) upon a third or subsequent conviction.

(e) The court may, in addition to the fine imposed upon a conviction, require as a condition of probation, in addition to any other condition of probation, that any person convicted of a violation of this section pick up litter at a time and place within the jurisdiction of the court for not less than eight hours.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 416, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

374.5.

(a) It is unlawful for any grease waste hauler to do either of the following:

(1) Reinsert, deposit, dump, place, release, or discharge into a grease trap, grease interceptor, manhole, cleanout, or other sanitary sewer appurtenance any materials that the hauler has removed from the grease trap or grease interceptor, or to cause those materials to be so handled.

(2) Cause or permit to be discharged in or on any waters of the state, or discharged in or deposited where it is, or probably will be, discharged in or on any waters of the state, any materials that the hauler has removed from the grease trap or grease interceptor, or to cause those materials to be so handled.

(b) The prohibition in subdivision (a), as it pertains to reinsertion of material removed from a grease trap or grease interceptor, shall not apply to a grease waste hauler if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The local sewer authority having jurisdiction over the pumping and disposal of the material specifically allows a registered grease waste hauler to obtain written approval for the reinsertion of decanted liquid.

(2) The local sewer authority has determined that, if reinsertion is allowed, it is feasible to enforce local discharge limits for fats, oil, and grease, if any, and other local requirements for best management or operating practices, if any.

(3) The grease waste hauler is registered pursuant to Section 19310 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(4) The registered grease waste hauler demonstrates to the satisfaction of the local sewer authority all of the following:

(A) It will use equipment that will adequately separate the water from the grease waste and solids in the material so as to comply with applicable regulations.

(B) Its employees are adequately trained in the use of that equipment.

(5) The registered grease waste hauler demonstrates both of the following:

(A) It has informed the managerial personnel of the owner or operator of the grease trap or interceptor, in writing, that the grease waste hauler may reinsert the decanted materials, unless the owner or operator objects to the reinsertion.

(B) The owner or operator has not objected to the reinsertion of the decanted materials. If the owner or operator of the grease trap or interceptor objects to the reinsertion, no decanted material may be inserted in that grease trap or interceptor.

(c) A grease waste hauler shall not transport grease removed from a grease trap or grease interceptor in the same vehicle used for transporting other waste, including, but not limited to, yellow grease, cooking grease, recyclable cooking oil, septic waste, or fluids collected at car washes.

(d) For purposes of this section, a “grease waste hauler” is a transporter of inedible kitchen grease subject to registration requirements pursuant to Section 19310 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(e) Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than six months or a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both a fine and imprisonment.

A second and subsequent conviction, shall be punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or a fine of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or both a fine and imprisonment.

(f) Notwithstanding Section 1463, the fines paid pursuant to this section shall be apportioned as follows:

(1) Fifty percent shall be deposited in the Environmental Enforcement and Training Account established pursuant to Section 14303, and used for purposes of Title 13 (commencing with Section 14300) of Part 4.

(2) Twenty-five percent shall be distributed pursuant to Section 1463.001.

(3) Twenty-five percent to the local health officer or other local public officer or agency that investigated the matter which led to bringing the action.

(g) If the court finds that the violator has engaged in a practice or pattern of violation, consisting of two or more convictions, the court may bar the violating individual or business from engaging in the business of grease waste hauling for a period not to exceed five years.

(h) The court may require, in addition to any fine imposed upon conviction, that as a condition of probation and in addition to any other punishment or condition of probation, that a person convicted under this section remove, or pay the cost of removing, to the extent they are able, any materials which the convicted person dumped or caused to be dumped in violation of this section.

(i) This section does not prohibit the direct receipt of trucked grease by a publicly owned treatment works.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 190.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

374.7.

(a) A person who litters or causes to be littered, or dumps or causes to be dumped, waste matter into a bay, lagoon, channel, river, creek, slough, canal, lake, or reservoir, or other stream or body of water, or upon a bank, beach, or shore within 150 feet of the high water mark of a stream or body of water, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) A person convicted of a violation of subdivision (a) shall be punished by a mandatory fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) upon a first conviction, by a mandatory fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) upon a second conviction, and by a mandatory fine of not less than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) nor more than three thousand dollars ($3,000) upon a third or subsequent conviction.

(c) The court may, in addition to the fine imposed upon a conviction, require as a condition of probation, in addition to any other condition of probation, that any person convicted of a violation of subdivision (a), pick up litter at a time and place within the jurisdiction of the court for not less than eight hours.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 416, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

374.8.

(a) In any prosecution under this section, proof of the elements of the offense shall not be dependent upon the requirements of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(b) Any person who knowingly causes any hazardous substance to be deposited into or upon any road, street, highway, alley, or railroad right-of-way, or upon the land of another, without the permission of the owner, or into the waters of this state is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for a term of 16 months, two years, or three years, or by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than ten thousand
 dollars ($10,000), or by both the fine and imprisonment, unless the deposit occurred as a result of an emergency that the person promptly reported to the appropriate regulatory authority.

(c) For purposes of this section, “hazardous substance” means either of the following:

(1) Any material that, because of its quantity, concentration, or physical or chemical characteristics, poses a significant present or potential hazard to human health and safety or to the environment if released into the environment, including, but not limited to, hazardous waste and any material that the administering agency or a handler, as defined in Chapter 6.91 (commencing with Section 25410) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code, has a reasonable basis for believing would be injurious to the health and safety of persons or harmful to the environment if released into the environment.

(2) Any substance or chemical product for which one of the following applies:

(A) The manufacturer or producer is required to prepare a MSDS, as defined in Section 6374 of the Labor Code, for the substance or product pursuant to the Hazardous Substances Information Training Act (Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 6360) of Part 1 of Division 5 of the Labor Code) or pursuant to any applicable federal law or regulation.

(B) The substance is described as a radioactive material in Chapter 1 of Title 10 of the Code of Federal Regulations maintained and updated by the Nuclear Regulatory Commission.

(C) The substance is designated by the Secretary of Transportation in Chapter 27 (commencing with Section 1801) of the appendix to Title 49 of the United States Code
 and taxed as a radioactive substance or material.

(D) The materials listed in subdivision (b) of Section 6382 of the Labor Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 338.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

374a.

A person giving information leading to the arrest and conviction of a person for a violation of Section 374c, 374.2, 374.3, 374.4, or 374.7 is entitled to a reward for providing the information.

The amount of the reward for each arrest and conviction shall be 50 percent of the fine levied against and collected from the person who violated Section 374c, 374.2, 374.3, 374.4, or 374.7 and shall be paid by the court. If the reward is payable to two or more persons, it shall be divided equally. The amount of collected fine to be paid under this section shall be paid prior to any distribution of the fine that may be prescribed by any other section, including Section 1463.9, with respect to the same fine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 416, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

374c.

Every person who shoots any firearm from or upon a public road or highway is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1933, Ch. 203.)
-------------------------------------------

374d.

Every person who knowingly allows the carcass of any dead animal which belonged to him at the time of its death to be put, or to remain, within 100 feet of any street, alley, public highway, or road in common use, and every person who puts the carcass of any dead animal within 100 feet of any street, alley, highway, or road in common use is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 657.)
-------------------------------------------

375.

(a) It shall be unlawful to throw, drop, pour, deposit, release, discharge or expose, or to attempt to throw, drop, pour, deposit, release, discharge or expose in, upon or about any theater, restaurant, place of business, place of amusement or any place of public assemblage, any liquid, gaseous or solid substance or matter of any kind which is injurious to person or property, or is nauseous, sickening, irritating or offensive to any of the senses.

(b) It shall be unlawful to manufacture or prepare, or to possess any liquid, gaseous, or solid substance or matter of any kind which is injurious to person or property, or is nauseous, sickening, irritating or offensive, to any of the senses
 with intent to throw, drop, pour, deposit, release, discharge or expose the same in, upon or about any theater, restaurant, place of business, place of amusement, or any other place of public assemblage.

(c) Any person violating any of the provisions hereof shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than three months and not more than one year, or by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) and not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(d) Any person who, in violating any of the provisions of subdivision (a), willfully employs or uses any liquid, gaseous or solid substance which may produce serious illness or permanent injury through being vaporized or otherwise dispersed in the air or who, in violating any of the provisions of subdivision (a), willfully employs or uses any tear gas, mustard gas or any of
 the combinations or compounds thereof, or willfully employs or uses acid or explosives, shall be guilty of a felony and shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 339.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

377.

Every person who, in order to obtain for himself or another any drug that can be lawfully dispensed by a pharmacist only on prescription, falsely represents himself to be a physician or other person who can lawfully prescribe such drug, or falsely represents that he is acting on behalf of a person who can lawfully prescribe such drug, in a telephone communication with a pharmacist, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1272.)
-------------------------------------------

379.

Every person who sells, dispenses, distributes, furnishes, administers, gives, or offers to sell, dispense, distribute, furnish, administer, or give Salvia divinorum or Salvinorin A, or any substance or material containing Salvia divinorum or Salvinorin A, to any person who is less than 18 years of age, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 184, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

380.

(a) Every person who sells, dispenses or distributes toluene, or any substance or material containing toluene, to any person who is less than 18 years of age shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be fined in a sum of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), nor more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), or by imprisonment for not less than six months nor more than one year.

(b) The court shall order the suspension of the business license, for a period of one year, of a person who knowingly violates any of the provisions of this section after having been previously convicted of a violation of this section unless the owner of such business license can demonstrate a good faith attempt to prevent illegal sales or deliveries by employees. The provisions of this subdivision shall become operative on July 1, 1980.

(c) The provisions of this section shall apply to, but are not limited to, the sale or distribution of glue, cement, dope, paint thinners, paint, and any combination of hydrocarbons either alone or in combination with any substance or material including, but not limited to, paint, paint thinners, shellac thinners, and solvents which, when inhaled, ingested or breathed, can cause a person to be under the influence of, or intoxicated from, any such combination of hydrocarbons.

This section shall not prohibit the sale of gasoline or other motor vehicle fuels to persons less than 18 years of age.

(d) This section shall not apply to any glue or cement which has been certified by the State Department of Health Services as containing a substance which makes such glue or cement malodorous or causes such glue or cement to induce sneezing, nor shall this section apply where the glue or cement is sold, delivered, or given away simultaneously with or as part of a kit used for the construction of model airplanes, model boats, model automobiles, model trains, or other similar models or used for the assembly or creation of hobby craft items using such components as beads, tiles, tiffany glass, ceramics, clay, or other craft-related components.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1011, Sec. 1.   Effective September 21, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

381.

(a) Any person who possesses toluene or any substance or material containing toluene, including, but not limited to, glue, cement, dope, paint thinner, paint and any combination of hydrocarbons, either alone or in combination with any substance or material including but not limited to paint, paint thinner, shellac thinner, and solvents, with the intent to breathe, inhale, or ingest for the purpose of causing a condition of intoxication, elation, euphoria, dizziness, stupefaction, or dulling of the senses or for the purpose of, in any manner, changing, distorting, or disturbing the audio, visual, or mental processes, or who knowingly and with the intent to do so is under the influence of toluene or any material containing toluene, or any combination
 of hydrocarbons is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) Any person who possesses any substance or material, which the State Department of Public Health has determined by regulations adopted pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) has toxic qualities similar to toluene, with the intent to breathe, inhale, or ingest for the purpose of causing a condition of intoxication, elation, euphoria, dizziness, excitement, irrational behavior, exhilaration, satisfaction, stupefaction, or dulling of the senses or for the purpose of, in any manner, changing, distorting, or disturbing the audio, visual, or mental processes, or who is under the influence of such substance or material is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 203.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

381a.

Any person, or persons, whether as principals, agents, managers, or otherwise, who buy or sell dairy products, or deal in milk, cream or butter, and who buy or sell the same upon the basis of their richness or weight or the percentage of cream, or butter-fat contained therein, who use any apparatus, test bottle or other appliance, or who use the “Babcock test” or machine of like character for testing such dairy products, cream or butter, which is not accurate and correct, or which gives wrong or false percentages, or which is calculated in any way to defraud or injure the person with whom he deals, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned in the county jail not more than six (6) months.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 275.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

381b.
